District of Columbia statutes.
3-1206.22

Required disclosures.

Unless also licensed by the Board of Medicine to practice medicine in the District, practitioners of naturopathic medicine shall:

(1)

Provide to the client or patient, before providing services, a written notice in a language the client or patient understands that the practitioner is not licensed to practice medicine; and

(2)

Obtain written acknowledgment from the client or patient that the client or patient has been provided the notice required in paragraph (1) of this section.

Mar. 25, 1986, D.C. Law 6-99, § 622
as added July 8, 2004, D.C. Law 15-172, § 2(g), 51 DCR 4938